Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2625
Nonresident applicant; reciprocity.

The director may exempt from examination any nonresident applicant whose resident state or province has examination standards substantially the same as those of Nebraska, if such state or province has been recognized by the director by reciprocal arrangement. The director may accept, in lieu of examination of such nonresident, a certificate of the director or commissioner of the other state or province to the effect that the applicant is licensed in the state or province in a capacity similar to that for which a license is sought in this state. In instances when a reciprocal agreement has not been reached, the director shall require an examination.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 20.